Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2h. new text end new text begin Firefighter emergency medical technician; special plates. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must issue special firefighter emergency medical technician plates to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is certified as an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic by the Office of Emergency Medical Services under section 144E.28 and has a letter from the office affirming the applicant is in good standing and not subject to discipline; new text end new text begin (2) is a member of a fire department, as defined in section 299N.01, subdivision 2; has a letter from the fire chief; and is an owner of a passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, or motorcycle; new text end new text begin (3) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under subdivision 5, for each set of license plates applied for along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (4) pays the registration tax required by this chapter for the motor vehicle; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must design the special plate emblem so that it is distinguishable from the emblems on firefighter special plates issued under subdivision 2b and volunteer ambulance attendant special plates issued under subdivision 2e. new text end new text begin (c) Special plates issued under this subdivision may only be used during the period that the owner of the motor vehicle is a member of a fire department and a certified emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic as specified in this subdivision. When the individual to whom the special plates were issued is no longer a member of a fire department or no longer a certified emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic or when the motor vehicle ownership is transferred, the owner must remove the special plates from the motor vehicle. If the commissioner receives written notification that an individual is no longer qualified for these special plates, the commissioner must invalidate the plates and notify the individual of this action. The individual may retain the plate only upon demonstrating compliance with the qualifications of this subdivision. Upon removal or invalidation of the special plates or special motorcycle plate, the owner or purchaser of the motor vehicle must obtain regular plates, a regular motorcycle plate, or special plates for the proper registration classification for the motor vehicle. new text end new text begin (d) On payment of a transfer fee of $5, plates issued under this subdivision may be transferred to another passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, or motorcycle registered to the individual to whom the special plates were issued. new text end new text begin (e) Fees collected under this subdivision must be credited to the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner may adopt rules under the Administrative Procedure Act, sections 14.001 to 14.69, to govern the issuance and use of the special plates authorized in this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to firefighter emergency medical technician plates issued on or after that date. new text end